Utah statutes.
59-10-519.   Place for filing returns or other documents.

When not otherwise provided for by this chapter, the commission shall by rule prescribe the place for the filing of any return, statement, or other documents, or copies thereof, required by this chapter or rules.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 2, 1987 General Session

